Florida, session 2026, SB606.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 383.3363, Florida Statutes, is created 25 to read: 26 383.3363âEducation on drowning prevention safety measures 27 and safe bathing practices.â 28 (1)âThe Department of Health shall develop educational 29 materials on drowning prevention safety measures and safe 30 bathing practices to be distributed to parents or caregivers as 31 part of postpartum or childbirth education provided by 32 hospitals, birth centers, home birth providers, and childbirth 33 educators in this state. The materials must include, but need 34 not be limited to, instruction on all of the following: 35 (a)âThe increased risk of drowning for infants and toddlers 36 in bathtubs, pools, and other water sources, citing available 37 data on such drownings. 38 (b)âWater safety measures parents can employ to prevent 39 drowning, emphasizing the importance of constant supervision of 40 infants and children while they are around water and the 41 benefits of early childhood swimming lessons and water 42 competency programs as an added layer of protection from 43 drownings. 44 (c)âAdditional safety hazards in the home setting and 45 evidence-based safe bathing practices. 46 (2)âEach hospital, birth center, and home birth provider 47 providing maternity, prenatal, and newborn services shall 48 provide the educational materials developed under subsection (1) 49 to the parents or caregivers of a newborn as part of its 50 postpartum education and care. Hospitals, birth centers, and 51 home birth providers shall maintain proof of compliance with 52 this subsection and make such records available to the Agency 53 for Health Care Administration upon request. 54 (3)âChildbirth educators shall provide the educational 55 materials developed under subsection (1) to the parents or 56 caregivers receiving childbirth education. 57 Section 2.âParagraph (j) is added to subsection (4) of 58 section 383.318, Florida Statutes, to read: 59 383.318âPostpartum care for birth center clients and 60 infants.â 61 (4)âThe birth center shall provide a postpartum evaluation 62 and followup care that includes all of the following: 63 (j)âProvision of the educational materials on drowning 64 prevention safety measures and safe bathing practices developed 65 by the Department of Health under s. 383.3363. Birth centers 66 shall maintain proof of compliance with the requirements of this 67 paragraph and make such records available to the Agency for 68 Health Care Administration upon request. 69 Section 3.âSection 395.1053, Florida Statutes, is amended 70 to read: 71 395.1053âPostpartum education.â 72 (1)âA hospital that provides birthing services shall 73 provide each parent with postpartum education on the care of 74 newborns, which must include all of the following: 75 (a)âincorporate Information on safe sleep practices and the 76 possible causes of Sudden Unexpected Infant Death. into the 77 hospitalâs postpartum instruction on the care of newborns and 78 provide to each parent 79 (b)âProvision of the informational pamphlet on infant and 80 childhood eye and vision disorders created by the department 81 pursuant to s. 383.14(3)(h). 82 (c)âProvision of the educational materials on drowning 83 prevention safety measures and safe bathing practices developed 84 by the department under s. 383.3363. 85 (2)âHospitals shall maintain proof of compliance with the 86 requirements of this section and make such records available to 87 the agency upon request. 88 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.